Tennessee, session 114, SB1026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-103(a)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting "September 1" and substituting "October 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1026
000875
- 1 -